Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1115.01
Assistive technology device, defined.

Assistive technology device means any item, piece of equipment, or product system, whether acquired commercially off-the-shelf or modified or customized, that is used to increase, maintain, or improve functional capabilities of a child with a disability.

Laws 1997, LB 865, § 6;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 15.